Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-901
Wildlife-restoration projects; cooperation with federal government; hunters' fees; expenditure.

The State of Nebraska hereby assents to the provisions of an Act of Congress entitled An Act to provide that the United States shall aid the states in wildlife-restoration projects, and for other purposes, approved September 2, 1937, (Public Law No. 415, 75th Congress), and the Game and Parks Commission is hereby authorized, empowered, and directed to perform such acts as may be necessary to the conduct and establishment of cooperative wildlife-restoration projects, as defined in the Act of Congress, in compliance with the act and with rules and regulations promulgated by the Secretary of the Interior thereunder. No funds accruing to the State of Nebraska from permit or license fees paid by hunters shall be diverted for any other purpose than the administration of the Game and Parks Commission.

Laws 1939, c. 41, § 1, p. 199;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 37-427;

R.S.1943, § 37-422;

Laws 1957, c. 139, § 12, p. 470;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-422;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 362.